New York, session 2025-2026, A3534.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 503 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 3-a to read as follows: 3 3-a. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no fees 4 shall be charged for the application, processing or issuance, including 5 photo image fees, for a renewal of a driver's license or non-driver 6 identification card that is REAL ID compliant with federal law under 7 United States Public Law 109-13. 8 § 2. The commissioner of motor vehicles shall refund any fees paid 9 since January 1, 2017 for a REAL ID driver's license or non-driver iden- 10 tification card which was issued to any person with an existing license 11 or non-driver identification card prior to the expiration period for 12 such license or card. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 14 section one of this act shall expire and be deemed repealed on and after 15 December 31, 2027. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06688-01-5